New York, session 2025-2026, S3980.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 60.42 of the criminal procedure law, as amended by 2 section 1 of part R of chapter 55 of the laws of 2019 and subdivision 3 3 as amended by chapter 777 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 § 60.42 Rules of evidence; admissibility of evidence of victim's sexual 6 conduct in sex offense cases. 7 Evidence of a victim's sexual conduct shall not be admissible in a 8 prosecution for an offense or an attempt to commit an offense defined in 9 article one hundred thirty or in section 230.34 of the penal law unless 10 such evidence: 11 1. proves or tends to prove specific instances of the victim's prior 12 sexual conduct with the accused; or 13 2. [proves or tends to prove that the victim has been convicted of an 14 offense under section 230.00 of the penal law within three years prior 15 to the sex offense which is the subject of the prosecution; or 16 3.] rebuts evidence introduced by the people of the victim's failure 17 to engage in vaginal sexual contact, oral sexual contact, anal sexual 18 contact or sexual contact during a given period of time; or 19 [4.] 3. rebuts evidence introduced by the people which proves or tends 20 to prove that the accused is the cause of pregnancy or disease of the 21 victim, or the source of semen found in the victim; or 22 [5.] 4. is determined by the court after an offer of proof by the 23 accused outside the hearing of the jury, or such hearing as the court 24 may require, and a statement by the court of its findings of fact essen- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00640-01-5 S. 3980 2 1 tial to its determination, to be relevant and admissible in the inter- 2 ests of justice. 3 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 4 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.